Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7460.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-21.1-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-21.1 entitled
"Transportation of School Pupils Beyond City and Town Limits [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The
Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-21.1-8. Statewide transportation system for all students.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding the regional structure created in this chapter, and upon
implementation of a statewide school transportation system for all students, each school committee
shall purchase the transportation services for their own resident students by accessing this
integrated statewide system of transportation on a fee-for-service basis for each child; provided,
however, that any school committee that fulfills its transportation obligations predominantly
through the use of district-owned buses or district employees may apply for a variance from the
commissioner of education, or the commissioner’s designee, thereby requesting that its
transportation obligations continue to be achieved through the use of the buses owned by the district
and staffed by district employees. All fees paid for transportation services provided to students
under the statewide system shall be paid into a statewide student transportation services restricted
receipt account within the department of elementary and secondary education. Payments from the
account shall be limited to payments to the transportation service provider and transportation
system consultants. This restricted receipt account shall not be subject to the indirect cost recoveries
provisions set forth in § 35-4-27. The goals of the statewide system of transportation for all students

shall be the reduction of duplication of cost and routes in transporting children from the various
cities and towns using different buses within and between each city and town, the improvement of
services to children through the development of shorter ride times and more efficient routes of
travel, and the reduction of cost to local school committees through achieving efficiency in
eliminating the need for each school district to contract for and provide these transportation services
separately.
(2) Any and all local education agencies and/or municipalities may contract out of the
statewide transportation system if they can find a more cost-effective option than the current fee-
for-service model as set forth in subsection (a)(1) of this section; provided, however, the local
educational agency and/or municipality shall demonstrate financial savings to the state education
commissioner in order to opt out of statewide transportation and contract transportation for their
students. If the education commissioner approves the request of the local education agency and/or
municipality to opt out of statewide transportation, then said local education agency and/or
municipality shall not be penalized in any and all state aid appropriations for contracting the service.
(b) There shall be deducted from the final aid payment to each school district any amounts
owed to the state at the end of the fiscal year for transportation of the district’s students under the
statewide transportation system established pursuant to this section. Districts shall receive monthly
invoices summarizing the basis of the transportation fees charged. Any such deductions in aid shall
be transferred to the statewide student transportation services restricted receipt account, as set forth
in § 35-4-27.
(c) No school committee shall negotiate, extend, or renew any public transportation service
contract unless the contract provides for payments to school bus drivers, attendants, monitors, and
aides for one hundred and eighty (180) days or the length of the contracted-for school year,
whichever is longer.
(d) With respect to any contract entered into under this section, a school committee or local
education agency shall give a preference in contract and/or subcontract awards to the public
transportation provider that uses electric buses to the greatest extent. This preference shall be given
equal weight to any other preferences available to vendors.
(e) With respect to any contract entered into under this section, no school committee or
local education agency (“LEA”) shall take any adverse disciplinary action against any school bus
driver, attendant, monitor, or aide covered by a collective bargaining agreement prior to any
investigation or action taken by the contracting entity as provided for in the collective bargaining
agreement. Nor shall the school committee or LEA impose discipline in excess of what is provided
for in the governing collective bargaining agreement.
LC003605 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003605
========
LC003605 - Page 3 of 4